Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1761
Unfair competition and deceptive practices statutes; applicable.

Actions and transaction prohibited by the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act shall be subject to section 59-1602 and all statutes which provide for the implementation and enforcement of such section.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 61;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 30.